Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.09
Sections; exceptions.

Nothing in sections 81-1108.09 and 81-1108.41 to 81-1108.43 shall apply to any actions of the Legislature in contracting for the planning, design, construction, or leasing of capital facilities for any state use.

Laws 1969, c. 772, § 7, p. 2925;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 37.